Utah statutes.
9-7-208.   Digital library for permanent public access.
(1)  The division shall manage and maintain an online, web-accessible digital
library for state publications.
(2)  The division shall provide for permanent public access to the
publications in the digital library.
(3)  The library shall be accessible by agency, author, title, subject,
keyword, and such other means as provided by the division.
(4) (a)  Each state agency publishing a digital version of a state publication
shall deposit a digital copy of the publication with the division.
(b)  A state agency may not remove a state publication it posts to its public
website until a copy is deposited into the digital library for permanent
public access.
